Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1863.
hereby enacts as follows:CHAPTER 1PRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSection 101. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Public Option Program Act.Section 102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Covered person." A policyholder, subscriber or other individual who is entitled to receive health care services under a health insurance policy."Department." The Insurance Department of the Commonwealth."Facility." A health care setting or institution providing health care services, including:(1) A general, special, psychiatric or rehabilitation hospital.(2) An ambulatory surgical facility.(3) A cancer treatment center.(4) A birth center.20250HB1863PN2312 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) A skilled nursing center.(6) An inpatient, outpatient or residential drug and alcohol treatment facility.(7) A facility licensed by the Office of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services of the Department of Human Services.(8) A laboratory, imaging, diagnostic or other outpatient medical service or testing facility.(9) A health care provider office or clinic."Fund." The Public Option Program Fund established under section 501."Health care practitioner." As follows:(1) A licensed hospital or health care facility, medical equipment supplier or person who is licensed, certified or otherwise regulated to provide health care services under the laws of this Commonwealth, including a physician, podiatrist, optometrist, psychologist, physical therapist, certified nurse practitioner, registered nurse, nurse midwife, physician's assistant, chiropractor, dentist, pharmacist or an individual accredited or certified to provide behavioral health services.(2) The term includes an individual providing emergency services under a licensed emergency medical services agency as defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 8103 (relating to definitions)."Health care service." Any covered treatment, admission, procedure, medical supplies and equipment or other services, including behavioral health, prescribed or otherwise provided or proposed to be provided by a health care provider to a covered person for the diagnosis, prevention, treatment, cure or relief of a health condition, illness, injury or disease under the 20250HB1863PN2312 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 terms of a health insurance policy."Health insurance policy." As follows:(1) A policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan issued by an insurer that provides medical or health care coverage.(2) The term does not include any of the following:(i) An accident only policy.(ii) A credit only policy.(iii) A long-term care or disability income policy.(iv) A specified disease policy.(v) A Medicare supplement policy.(vi) A TRICARE policy, including a Civilian Health and Medical Program of the Uniformed Services (CHAMPUS) supplement policy.(vii) A fixed indemnity policy.(viii) A hospital indemnity policy.(ix) A dental only policy.(x) A vision only policy.(xi) A workers' compensation policy.(xii) An automobile medical payment policy under 75 Pa.C.S. (relating to vehicles).(xiii) A homeowner's insurance policy.(xiv) Any other similar policies providing for limited benefits."Individual market." The market for health insurance coverage offered to individuals other than in connection with a group."Insurer." An entity licensed by the department that offers, issues or renews an individual or group health insurance policy that is offered or governed under any of the following:20250HB1863PN2312 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, including section 630 and Article XXIV of that act.(2) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the Health Maintenance Organization Act.(3) 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations) or 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations)."Large group market." The market for health insurance coverage offered through a group health insurance policy for a group of 51 or more employees, exclusive of dependents."Program." The Public Option Program established under section 301."Qualified health plan." As defined in 42 U.S.C. § 18021(a)(1) (relating to qualified health plan defined)."Reference premium." For health insurance offered on the individual market, the second-lowest cost silver plan for a given zip code, as determined in accordance with 26 CFR 1.36B-3(f) (relating to computing the premium assistance credit amount)."Small group market." The market for health insurance coverage offered through a group health insurance policy for a group of at least 1 employee and up to 50 employees, exclusive of dependents.CHAPTER 3PUBLIC OPTION PROGRAMSection 301. Establishment of program.The Public Option Program is established within the department.Section 302. Operation of program.20250HB1863PN2312 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The department shall operate the program for the purposes of developing and offering health insurance coverage in the individual market on the exchange established under 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 93 (relating to State-based exchange). The department shall develop and offer health insurance coverage in the small group market and may develop and offer health insurance coverage in the large group market in a manner determined by the department.Section 303. Contracts.The department may make, execute and deliver contracts or other arrangements, including interagency agreements with Commonwealth agencies, to perform activities necessary or appropriate to further the purposes of this act.Section 304. Qualified health insurance policies.(a) Restrictions.--The department may limit the availability of individual market health insurance policies offered through the program by restricting the availability of the policies on the exchange established under 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 93 (relating to State-based exchange).(b) Compliance.--If individual market health insurance policies are available for purchase on the exchange established under 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 93, the health insurance policies shall comply with all Federal and State law applicable to qualified health plans.Section 305. Enrollment.(a) Health care practitioners.--A health care practitioner may enroll as a participating health care practitioner with the program.(b) Facilities.--A facility may enroll as a participating facility with the program.Section 306. Eligibility.20250HB1863PN2312 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Individual market health insurance policies.--(1) For individual market health insurance policies offered through the program, which are available on the exchange established under 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 93 (relating to State-based exchange), an individual may only enroll in the health insurance policy if the individual satisfies the eligibility criteria specified in 45 CFR 155.305 (relating to eligibility standards).(2) The department may establish eligibility criteria for individual market health insurance policies offered through the program which are not available for purchase through the exchange established under 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 93.(b) Small group market and large group market health insurance policies.--The department may establish eligibility criteria for groups to purchase small group market or large group market health insurance policies through the program.Section 307. Coverage requirements.(a) Components.--Health insurance policies offered through the program shall provide coverage for all of the following:(1) Essential health benefits inclusive of:(i) Ambulatory patient services.(ii) Emergency services.(iii) Hospitalization.(iv) Maternity and newborn care.(v) Mental health and substance use disorder services, including behavioral health treatment.(vi) Prescription drugs.(vii) Rehabilitative and habilitative services and devices.(viii) Laboratory services.20250HB1863PN2312 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ix) Preventive and wellness services and chronic disease management.(x) Pediatric services, including oral and vision care.(2) Dependents up to 26 years of age.(3) Dental benefits.(4) Vision benefits.(5) Spousal or domestic partner coverage.(b) Different levels of coverage.--Health insurance policies offered by the program shall provide different levels of coverage in accordance with 42 U.S.C. § 18022(d) (relating to essential health benefits requirements).(c) Compliance.--Except as provided in subsections (a) and (b), health insurance policies offered through the program must comply with all relevant Federal or State law governing health insurance policies issued in the individual market, small group market or large group market, as applicable.Section 308. Reimbursement rates.The total amount that an individual or small group or large group health insurance policy reimburses providers and facilities for all covered benefits under the health insurance policy may not exceed 160% of the total amount Medicare would reimburse providers and facilities for the same or similar services in the Statewide aggregate.Section 309. Premiums.The premiums for individual market health insurance policies offered in a zip code or small group and large group health insurance policies offered in a geographic region through the program shall be at least:(1) Five percent lower than the reference premium for 20250HB1863PN2312 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the zip code or geographic region for the first year of implementation.(2) Ten percent lower than the reference premium for the zip code or geographic region for the second year of implementation.(3) Twelve and five-tenths percent lower than the reference premium for the zip code or geographic region for the third year of implementation.(4) Fifteen percent lower than the reference premium for the zip code or geographic region for the fourth year of implementation and in any subsequent years of the program's operation.CHAPTER 5PUBLIC OPTION PROGRAM FUNDSection 501. Establishment of fund.The Public Option Program Fund is established in the State Treasury.Section 502. Administration and purposes.The department shall administer the fund to implement and administer the program and provide for the payment of expenses associated with staffing requirements.Section 503. Appropriation on continuing basis.Money in the fund and the interest accruing on the money in the fund are appropriated on a continuing basis to the department for the purposes described in section 502.Section 504. Fund sources.The department may solicit and accept money for the purposes described in section 502, including money appropriated by the General Assembly, grants, donations, gifts and other payments from any source, which shall be deposited into the fund.20250HB1863PN2312 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 505. Money to remain in fund.Any money remaining in the fund at the end of each fiscal year, including interest accruing on the money in the fund, shall not revert to the General Fund but shall remain in the fund.CHAPTER 7MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSection 701. Reports.(a) Annual report required.--No later than the first September 1 that is at least 365 days after the effective date of this subsection and each September 1 thereafter, the department shall compile an annual report detailing the effectiveness of the program.(b) Contents.--Each annual report under this section must include the following:(1) The number of individuals enrolled who received health insurance coverage under the program.(2) Demographic information about the individuals receiving health insurance coverage under the program.(3) Program premiums.(4) Funding used to operate the program.(5) The money remaining in the fund.(c) Distribution.--Each annual report under this section shall be distributed to:(1) The President pro tempore of the Senate.(2) The Speaker of the House of Representatives.(3) The Majority Leader and the Minority Leader of the Senate.(4) The Majority Leader and the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.20250HB1863PN2312 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Banking and Insurance Committee of the Senate.(6) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Insurance Committee of the House of Representatives.(7) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate.(8) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health Committee of the House of Representatives.(9) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Human Services Committee of the House of Representatives.(d) Posting.--Each annual report under this section shall be posted on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department.Section 702. Effective date.This act shall take effect as follows:(1) Chapter 3 shall take effect in 365 days.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1863PN2312 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718